Oklahoma, session 2026, SB503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 683.23, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 683.23. A. The Oklahoma Department of Emergency


Management (OEM) may request the Attorney General to institute a


civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary


injunction, restraining order, or any other appropriate order in the


appropriate district court, whenever any person:


1. Violates, or fails, or refuses to comply with any order or


decision issued by the OEM Department;


2. Interferes with, hinders, or delays the OEM Department in


carrying out its duties and responsibilities;



Req. No. 771 Page 1


3. Refuses to admit authorized representatives of the OEM


Department;


4. Refuses to permit inspection by authorized representatives


of the OEM Department;


5. Refuses to furnish any information or report requested by


the OEM Department to accomplish its duties and responsibilities; or


6. Refuses to permit access to, or copying of, such records as


the OEM Department determines necessary to accomplish its duties and


responsibilities.


B. The court shall have jurisdiction to provide such relief as


may be appropriate. Any relief granted by the court to enforce an


order under subsection A of this section shall continue in effect


until the completion or final termination of all proceedings for


review of such order is made, unless the district court granting


such relief sets it aside or modifies it.


C. Any person who willfully violating violates any rule,


regulation, or order of the OEM an emergency management director


with authority in that jurisdiction and acting in his or her


capacity as such shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of a


misdemeanor, and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished


punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six


(6) months, or by a fine of not more than Three Thousand Dollars


($3,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine. Each day of


violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Req. No. 771 Page 2


D. The Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Investigation, and the Oklahoma Tax Commission Any certified law


enforcement officer in this state shall assist the OEM an emergency


management director in the enforcement of any rule, regulation, or


order of the OEM emergency management director.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-771 CN 1/19/2025 5:37:40 AM

































Req. No. 771 Page 3